Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB355.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6301 of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 6301. Corruption of minors.* * *(e) Sentencing enhancement.--The Pennsylvania Commission on Sentencing, under 42 Pa.C.S. § 2154 (relating to adoption of guidelines for sentencing), shall provide for a sentencing enhancement for the courts to consider in cases involving a violation of subsection (a)(1)(ii) where the defendant is a mandated reporter under 23 Pa.C.S. § 6311 (relating to persons required to report suspected child abuse).<--1234567891011121314151617 SECTION 2. SECTION 6318(A) OF TITLE 18 IS AMENDED TO READ:§ 6318. UNLAWFUL CONTACT WITH MINOR.(A) OFFENSE DEFINED.--A PERSON COMMITS AN OFFENSE IF THE PERSON IS INTENTIONALLY IN CONTACT WITH A MINOR, OR A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER ACTING IN THE PERFORMANCE OF DUTIES WHO HAS ASSUMED THE IDENTITY OF A MINOR OR OF ANOTHER INDIVIDUAL HAVING DIRECT CONTACT WITH CHILDREN, AS DEFINED UNDER 23 PA.C.S. § 6303(A) (RELATING TO DEFINITIONS), FOR THE PURPOSE OF ENGAGING IN AN ACTIVITY PROHIBITED UNDER ANY OF THE FOLLOWING PROVISIONS UNDER THIS TITLE, AND EITHER THE PERSON INITIATING THE CONTACT OR THE PERSON BEING CONTACTED IS WITHIN THIS COMMONWEALTH:[(1) ANY OF THE OFFENSES ENUMERATED IN CHAPTER 31 (RELATING TO SEXUAL OFFENSES).](1.1) ANY OF THE OFFENSES ENUMERATED IN CHAPTER 30 (RELATING TO HUMAN TRAFFICKING), IF THE ACTIVITY INVOLVED SEXUAL SERVITUDE AND THE VICTIM WAS A MINOR.(1.2) ANY OF THE OFFENSES ENUMERATED IN CHAPTER 31 (RELATING TO SEXUAL OFFENSES).(1.3) INCEST AS DEFINED IN SECTION 4302(B) (RELATING TO INCEST).(1.4) ENDANGERING WELFARE OF CHILDREN AS DEFINED IN SECTION 4304(A)(1) (RELATING TO ENDANGERING WELFARE OF CHILDREN), IF THE ACTIVITY INVOLVED SEXUAL CONTACT WITH THE MINOR.(2) OPEN LEWDNESS AS DEFINED IN SECTION 5901 (RELATING TO OPEN LEWDNESS).(3) PROSTITUTION AS DEFINED IN SECTION 5902 (RELATING TO PROSTITUTION AND RELATED OFFENSES).(4) OBSCENE AND OTHER SEXUAL MATERIALS AND PERFORMANCES AS DEFINED IN SECTION 5903 (RELATING TO OBSCENE AND OTHER 20250HB0355PN1596 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SEXUAL MATERIALS AND PERFORMANCES).(4.1) CORRUPTION OF MINORS AS DEFINED IN SECTION 6301(A)(1)(I) (RELATING TO CORRUPTION OF MINORS), IF THE ACTIVITY INVOLVED SEXUAL CONTACT WITH THE MINOR.(4.2) CORRUPTION OF MINORS AS DEFINED IN SECTION 6301(A)(1)(II).(5) SEXUAL ABUSE OF CHILDREN AS DEFINED IN SECTION 6312 (RELATING TO SEXUAL ABUSE OF CHILDREN).(6) SEXUAL EXPLOITATION OF CHILDREN AS DEFINED IN SECTION 6320 (RELATING TO SEXUAL EXPLOITATION OF CHILDREN).(7) AN ATTEMPT, SOLICITATION OR CONSPIRACY TO COMMIT ANY OF THE OFFENSES IN THIS SUBSECTION.* * *Section 2 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0355PN1596 - 3 - <--1234567891011121314